Florida, session 2026, SB94.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 38 39 Section 1.âSubsection (6) is added to section 394.463, 40 Florida Statutes, to read: 41 394.463âInvoluntary examination.â 42 (6)âVETERAN AND MILITARY STATUS REPORTING.âAny facility 43 conducting an involuntary examination pursuant to this section 44 must include in its report to the Baker Act Reporting Center at 45 the Louis de la Parte Florida Mental Health Institute whether 46 the individual examined is an active or former member of the 47 United States Armed Forces, the National Guard, or their reserve 48 components. 49 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.